src/fst/morphology/stems/ojibwe_numerals.lexc
LEXICON NumeralRoot
@P.Paradigm.NUM@ NUM_Prefix ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NUM                                                        !
!         Prefixes                                                             !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NUM_Prefix
@P.Prefix.NONE@ NUM_PrefixBoundary ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NUM                                                        !
!         Morpheme boundary between prefix and stem                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NUM_PrefixBoundary
0:%<%< NumeralStems ;

LEXICON NumeralStems
@R.Paradigm.NUM@ NUM_Stems ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NUM                                                        !
!         Stems                                                                !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary
0:%>%> NUM_Class=NUM_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NUM, Class: NUM                                            !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NUM_Class=NUM_Flags
@R.Prefix.NONE@ NUM_Class=NUM_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NUM, Class: NUM                                            !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NUM_Class=NUM_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Other@ NUM_Class=NUM_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NUM, Class: NUM, Prefix: NONE, Order: Other                !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NUM_Class=NUM_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings
+NUM: EncliticRoot ;

LEXICON NUM_Stems
aabita-dibaabiishkoojigan NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
aabito-diba'igan NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ashi-aabita NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ashi-bezhig NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ashi-bezhigo-diba'igaans NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ashi-bezhigo-diba'iganens NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ashi-bezhigo-diba'oobaan NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ashi-bezhigo-dibik NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ashi-bezhigo-giizhigad NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ashi-bezhigo-giizis NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ashi-bezhigo-makak NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ashi-bezhigo-minikwaajigan NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ashi-bezhigobaneninj NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ashi-bezhigomooday NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ashi-bezhigon NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ashi-bezhigoninj NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ashi-bezhigookikoons NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ashi-bezhigooshkimod NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ashi-bezhigwemikwaanens NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ashi-ishwaaso-biboon NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ashi-ishwaasoninj NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ashi-ishwaaswaabik NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ashi-naanan NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ashi-naano-diba'igan NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ashi-naanoninj NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ashi-naanwaabik NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ashi-niiwin NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ashi-niizho-diba'igan NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ashi-niizhwaaswi:ashi-niizhwaaswiw2 NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ashi-ningodwaaso-diba'igan NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ashi-ningodwaasoninj NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ashi-ningodwaaswaabik NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ashi-nishwaaswi:ashi-nishwaaswiw2 NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ashi-niso-biboon NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ashi-nisoninj NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ashi-niswaabik NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ashi-zhaangaswi:ashi-zhaangaswiw2 NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
bebezhigweg NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
bezhigominag NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
bezhigwaatig NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
bezhigweg NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
daso-anama'e-giizhigad NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
daso-biboon NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
daso-diba'igan NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
daso-diba'oobaan NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
daso-dibik NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
daso-giizis NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
daso-mininj NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
dasodaabaan NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
dasogon NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
dasonaagaans NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
dasoninj NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
dasoonag NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
dasooshkin NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
dasozid NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
daswaak NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
daswashk NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
dasweginigan NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
daswewaan NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
dibaabiishkoojigan NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ingo-anama'e-giizhik NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ingo-diba'igaans NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ingo-diba'oobaan NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ingo-dibik NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ingo-giizis NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ingo-minikwaajigan NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ingodonaagaans NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ingodoninj NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ingodoonag NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ingodooshkin NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ingodozid NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ingodwaasimidana:ingodwaasimidanaw2 NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ingodwaaso-biboon NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ingodwaaso-diba'igan NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ingodwaaso-dibaabiishkoojigan NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ingodwaaso-giizhik NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ingodwaasobaneninj NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ingodwaasomooday NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ingodwaasoninj NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ingodwaasooshkin NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ingodwaaswaak NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ingodwaaswi:ingodwaaswiw2 NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ishwaaso-anama'e-giizhik NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ishwaaso-dibaabiishkoojigan NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ishwaaso-gikinoonowin NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ishwaasoninj NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ishwaasosagoons NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ishwaasweg NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
memidaaching NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
midaaso-biboon NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
midaaso-dibaabiishkoojigan NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
midaaso-gikinoonowin NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
midaasogon NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
midaasookik NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
midaasosagoons NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
midaasweg NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
mininj NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
naanimidano:naanimidanow2 NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
naano-diba'igan NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
naano-giizhik NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
naano-mininj NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
naanominag NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
naanoonag NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
naanozid NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
naanweg NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
nenaanan NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
neniizhooshkimod NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
neningodwaaswi:neningodwaaswiw2 NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niishtana:niishtanaw2 NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niiwashk NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niiwewaan NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niiwo-diba'igaans NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niiwo-giizhik NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niiwoninj NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niiwozid NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niiyo-diba'igan NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niiyo-giizhik NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niiyo-mizid NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niiyominag NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niiyookik NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niiyosagoons NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niizho-biboon NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niizho-dibaabiishkoojigan NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niizho-giizis NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niizho-mizid NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niizhominag NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niizhookik NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niizhosagoons NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niizhwaasimidana:niizhwaasimidanaw2 NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niizhwaaso-diba'igaans NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niizhwaaso-dibik NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niizhwaaso-minikwaajigan NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niizhwaasonaagaans NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niizhwaasoonag NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niizhwaasozid NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niizhwaaswaatig NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niizhwaaswi:niizhwaaswiw2 NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niizhwashk NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niizhwewaan NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ningo-diba'igan NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ningo-dibik NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ningo-makak NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ningo-misid NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ningodogamig NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ningodoninj NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ningodooshkimod NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ningodosagoons NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ningodwaaso:ningodwaasow2 NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ningodwaaso-diba'igan NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ningodwaaso-dibik NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ningodwaaso-makak NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ningodwaasogon NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ningodwaasookik NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ningodwaasooshkin NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ningodwaaswaabik NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ningodwaaswemikwaanens NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ningodwemikwaanens NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
ningozid NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
nishwaaso-anama'e-giizhik NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
nishwaaso-diba'iganens NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
nishwaaso-giizhik NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
nishwaaso-minikwaajigan NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
nishwaasomidano:nishwaasomidanow2 NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
nishwaasookik NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
nishwaasooshkin NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
nishwaaswaabik NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
nishwaaswemikwaanens NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niso-anama'e-giizhik NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niso-diba'iganens NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niso-dibik NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niso-gikinoonowin NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niso-mininj NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
nisodaabaan NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
nisomooday NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
nisoninj NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
nisooshkimod NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
nisozid NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niswaatig NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
niswewaan NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
zhaangaso:zhaangasow2 NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
zhaangaso-diba'igaans NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
zhaangaso-diba'oobaan NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
zhaangaso-giizhik NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
zhaangaso-michichin NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
zhaangasobaneninj NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
zhaangasomooday NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
zhaangasoninj NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
zhaangasooshkimod NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
zhaangaswaabik NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
zhaangaswemikwaanens NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
zhaangwaswemikwaanens NUM_Class=NUM_Boundary ;
